Utah statutes.
10-9a-803.   Penalties.
(1)  The municipality may, by ordinance, establish civil penalties for
violations of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any ordinances
adopted under the authority of this chapter.
(2)  Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any ordinances
adopted under the authority of this chapter is punishable as a class C
misdemeanor upon conviction either:
(a)  as a class C misdemeanor; or
(b)  by imposing the appropriate civil penalty adopted under the authority of
this section.
